Hawaii statutes.
§291E-39 Fees and costs. The director
may assess and collect a $30 fee from the respondent to cover the costs of
processing the respondent's request for an administrative hearing. These costs
include but shall not be limited to: the cost of photocopying documents;
conditional license permits, temporary permits, and relicensing forms;
interpreter services; and other similar costs; provided that the costs of
issuing subpoenas for witnesses, including mileage fees, shall be borne by the
party requesting the subpoena. The director may waive the fee in the case of
an indigent respondent, upon an appropriate inquiry into the financial
circumstances of the respondent seeking the waiver and an affidavit or a
certificate signed by the respondent demonstrating the respondent's financial
inability to pay the fee. [L 2000, c 189, pt of §23; am L 2001, c 157, §20; am
L 2003, c 31, §1; am L 2012, c 327, §16]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next